District of Columbia statutes.
28-3902

Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs as consumer protection agency.

(a)

The Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs shall be the principal consumer protection agency of the District of Columbia government and shall carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

The Director of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs shall exercise the powers set forth in section 28-3905 through the Office of Compliance, and shall appoint a Chief of the Office of Compliance from among active members of the unified District of Columbia Bar. The Chief of the Office of Compliance may carry out investigative, conciliatory, and other duties assigned by the Director.

(d)

Repealed.

(e)

The Mayor shall appoint one or more attorneys qualified to serve as administrative law judges or attorney examiners to conduct adjudicatory proceedings. Any administrative law judge or attorney examiner appointed pursuant to this subsection may hear cases pursuant to § 2-1801.03.

(f)

Repealed.

(g)

Repealed.

(h)

Repealed.

(i)

Notwithstanding any other provision of District law, enforcement of this chapter by the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs is suspended until October 1, 2002. This subsection shall not prevent the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs from cooperating with, and making appropriate referrals to, another law enforcement agency.

History

July 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-76, § 3, 23 DCR 1185
enacted, Sept. 6, 1980, D.C. Law 3-85, § 3(a), (d), 27 DCR 2900
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-159, § 2(a), 27 DCR 5147
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 422, 32 DCR 4450
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-234, § 2(c), 38 DCR 296
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 4, 38 DCR 314
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 27(a), (c), 40 DCR 6311
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 812, 42 DCR 3684
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 27(v), 44 DCR 1271
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1301(a), 45 DCR 1172
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1403, 45 DCR 7193
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 27(b), 46 DCR 2118
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 1402(c), 47 DCR 6308

Cross References

Prescription drug price posting, enforcement, cease and desist orders, see § 48-804.03.
Prescription drug price posting, informational posters provided to pharmacies, see § 48-801.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-3902.
1973 Ed., T. 28, Appx., § 3.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-172 in subsec. (i) substituted 2002 for 2000 and added a new sentence at the end thereof providing cooperating with and making referrals to another law enforcement agency.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 503 of Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Federal Law Conformity, Motor Vehicle Insurance, Regulatory Reform, and Consumer Law Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-154, September 18, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6951).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 811 of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 503 of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Federal Law Conformity Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-339, May 4, 1998, 45 DCR 2947) and § 503 of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Federal Law Conformity, Motor Vehicle Insurance, Regulatory Reform, and Consumer Law Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-429, August 6, 1998, 45 DCR 5890).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 1003 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794) and § 1003 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1003 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1402(c) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1402(c) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).